Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 7

Directional Signs

54-5-701. [Repealed.]

Acts 1953, ch. 31, § 1 (Williams, § 2799.1); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-536; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 472, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-701 concerned misdemeanor penalty for destroying or defacing markers erected on state highway.

54-5-702. [Repealed.]

Acts 1953, ch. 31, § 2 (Williams, § 2799.2); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-537; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 472, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-702 concerned state recovery for highway markers damaged by negligence.

54-5-703. Signs not to be erected along highways designated as main traveled roads.

No person not of the department shall erect a sign of any character upon the right-of-way of any street, road, or highway, outside of incorporated municipalities, designated by the department as a main traveled road and included in the general highway plan of the state.

Acts 1925, ch. 87, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1673a1; mod. Code 1932, § 2800; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-538; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Billboard regulation and control, title 54, ch. 21.

54-5-704. Directional signs on interstate highways denoting historic sites.

The department is directed to expand its interstate highway marking program by erecting and maintaining signs denoting Tennessee-owned historic sites, the signs to indicate the exit providing the closest and most direct access to the facility.

Acts 1974, ch. 560, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-580.

54-5-705. Historic sites eligible.

Tennessee-owned historic sites not currently marked are or will become eligible for interstate directional signs only if they are located within ten (10) miles of an interstate highway and if they are open to the public on a year-round basis.

Acts 1974, ch. 560, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-581.

54-5-706. Erection and placement of directional signs.

The department is directed to mark the appropriate exit to eligible facilities by erecting two (2) identifying signs of a size and color suitable for ready observation by the motorist on the interstate highway. The first of these signs shall be placed a proper distance before the exit and the second shall be placed at the exit and may be incorporated into the directional sign normally erected to indicate the city or connector route served by the exit. The signs shall be erected facing both directions of travel on the interstate route.

Acts 1974, ch. 560, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-582.

54-5-707. Advice of departments of education, and environment and conservation, and historical commission.

The departments of education, and environment and conservation, and the Tennessee historical commission are directed to cooperate with and to assist the department of transportation by advising the department concerning those historic sites that are or shall become eligible for interstate directional signs.

Acts 1974, ch. 560, § 4; T.C.A., § 54-583.

54-5-708. Directional signs denoting certain educational institutions.

It may be the duty of the department to implement a directional signing program for all institutions of higher learning, state colleges of applied technology, and state-operated special schools throughout the state, as follows:

Institutions that are located within ten (10) miles of an interchange on the federal-aid interstate system of highways shall be signed on the interstate highway system; provided, that all state community colleges may be signed on the highway system if the colleges are within nineteen (19) miles of an interchange on the highway system. Each institution meeting this criterion shall be signed at only one (1) interchange and shall be signed at the closest location, except where more than two (2) destinations are required to be signed at the same interchange. When this condition occurs, the two (2) closest institutions to the interchange shall be signed, with the remaining institution or institutions being signed at the second closest interchange;

Institutions that are not signed on the federal-aid interstate system of highways shall be signed at the road entering the state highway system nearest the institution; and

All signing shall meet federal highway administration requirements regarding the number of lines of sign legend, sign location and spacing.

Acts 1974, ch. 766, § 1; 1977, ch. 266, § 1; 1979, ch. 393, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-584; Acts 2013, ch. 473, § 25.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “state colleges of applied technology” for “state technology centers” in the introductory paragraph.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 473, § 28. July 1, 2013.

54-5-709. Directional signs denoting wildlife management areas, wildlife refuges and state lakes.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule and regulation to the contrary, the department of transportation is directed to implement a directional signing program on the state's state and federal highways denoting wildlife management areas, wildlife refuges and state lakes, established and operated pursuant to title 70.

The department shall promulgate necessary rules and regulations to accomplish the effect and intent of this section. The regulations shall provide for the department to charge fees to cover the cost of signing.

Acts 1997, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2.

54-5-710. Directional signs denoting certain airports.

The department is directed to implement a directional signing program on the state's section of the national system of interstate and defense highways denoting airports located not more than ten (10) miles from the highway as follows:

All such airports providing service to five thousand (5,000) commercial passengers per day if the airport is located in a county having a population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

All such airports providing service to three thousand (3,000) commercial passengers per day if the airport is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

All such airports that are regional airports:

Having at least a six thousand foot (6000') runway with at least two thousand three hundred feet (2,300') of approach lead in strobe lights;

Having at least fifty-eight (58) hangars;

Complying with all federal design/safety standards;

Having an instrument landing system with distance measuring equipment (ILS/DME);

Serving as the prime staging area for regional disaster preparedness and relief; and

Providing full-time trauma hospital flight access service.

Acts 2008, ch. 1170, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Effective Dates. Acts 2008, ch. 1170, § 2. July 1, 2008.